North Carolina, session 2025, SB108.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Notwithstanding G.S. 115D-9, 115D-15.1, and 143-341(3) or any
other provision of law, Johnston County (hereinafter "County") is hereby authorized to construct
community college buildings, as that term is defined in G.S. 143-336, on the campuses of
Johnston Community College (hereinafter "College"). For the purposes of this act, the terms
"construct" and "construction" include making additions, improvements, renovations, or repairs
to all or any part of a community college building. The County may finance the construction of
these buildings in accordance with Article 8 of Chapter 159 of the General Statutes and
G.S. 160A-20. If the County finances the construction of any building on the College's campuses,
the College Board of Trustees may, in connection with the construction, transfer any of its
property to the County to be used for security for the financing agreement. The County shall
transfer the property back to the College Board of Trustees when any financing agreement
entered into by the County to finance the construction has been satisfied. The County may also
construct the community college buildings using other funding sources, including appropriations
made by the General Assembly. Upon completion of the construction of the buildings, the County
shall lease the buildings to the College under the terms and conditions agreed to by both the
County and the College.
SECTION 1.(b) In constructing buildings as authorized by this act, the County does
not have to comply with the provisions of G.S. 115D-9 or Part 1 of Article 36 of Chapter 143 of
the General Statutes. However, the County shall comply with the provisions of Articles 3D and
8 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes. The County shall consult with the College Board of
Trustees about programming requirements for the buildings and shall keep the Board informed
as to the construction process and progress.
SECTION 1.(c) Prior to the construction of any building authorized by this act, the
County and College Board of Trustees shall enter into a memorandum of understanding that sets
forth the roles and responsibilities of each party for the construction of community college
buildings on the campuses of the College so that construction is completed in a timely fashion
and cost-efficient manner.
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies only to
construction projects, including additions, improvements, renovations, and repairs, coordinated
by the County for College uses and purposes.
*S108-v-2*